ko: 치과 물품 포함: 치아거울; 치아 연마기; 치간 칫솔; 플라그 제거 도구; 얼룩 지우개; 미백 페이스트; 기타
ro-RO: Produse stomatologice incluse: Oglindă dentară; Polizor dentar; Scobitoare interdentară; Instrument de îndepărtare a plăcii; Gumă dentară; Pastă de albire; Altele
hu: A tartalmazott fogászati cikkek: Fogászati tükör; Fogpolírozó; Fogköztisztító pálcika; Lepedékeltávolító eszköz; Folteltávolító radír; Fehérítő paszta; Egyéb
el: Περιλαμβάνονται οδοντιατρικά είδη: Οδοντιατρικός καθρέφτης; Στιλβωτικό δοντιών; Οδοντογλυφίδα για μεσοδόντια χρήση; Εργαλείο αφαίρεσης πλάκας; Εργαλείο αφαίρεσης κηλίδων; Λευκαντική πάστα; Άλλο
th: รายการทันตกรรมที่รวมอยู่: กระจกทันตกรรม; เครื่องขัดฟัน; แปรงขัดซอกฟัน; เครื่องมือขจัดคราบพลัค; แปรงขจัดคราบ; ยาสีฟันฟอกฟันขาว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Stomatologické nástroje v cene: Zubné zrkadlo; Zubná leštička; Medzizubná kefka; Nástroj na odstránenie plaku; Guma na škvrny; Bieliaca pasta; Iné
pl: W zestawie artykuły stomatologiczne: Lusterko dentystyczne; Polerka dentystyczna; Wykałaczka międzyzębowa; Narzędzie do usuwania płytki nazębnej; Odplamiacz; Pasta wybielająca; Inne
lt-LT: Komplekte esantys odontologiniai elementai: Odontologinis veidrodėlis; Odontologinis poliruoklis; Tarpdančių krapštukas; Apnašų šalinimo įrankis; Dėmių valiklis; Balinimo pasta; Kita
zh-CN: 内附牙科用品: 口腔镜; 牙科抛光器; 牙间刷; 牙菌斑清除工具; 去污工具; 美白牙膏; 其他
nl: Tandheelkundige artikelen inbegrepen: Tandspiegel; Tandpolijster; Interdentale rager; Hulpmiddel voor plakverwijdering; Vlekkengum; Bleekpasta; Andere
tr: Diş hekimliği ürünleri dahil: Diş aynası; Diş parlatıcı; Arayüz kürdanı; Plak temizleme aracı; Leke silgisi; Beyazlatıcı diş macunu; Diğer
cs: Včetně stomatologických předmětů: Zubní zrcátko; Leštička na zuby; Mezizubní párátko; Nástroj na odstranění plaku; Čistič skvrn; Bělící pasta; Jiné
de: Inbegriffene Zahnmedizinische Artikel: Dentalspiegel; Zahnpolierer; Interdentalbürste; Werkzeug zur Plaqueentfernung; Fleckenradierer; Aufhellungspaste; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Itens de dentista incluídos: Espelho odontológico; Polidor dentário; Palito interdental; Ferramenta de remoção de placa; Limpeza de manchas; Pasta branqueadora; Outro
fr: Articles de dentisterie inclus: Miroir dentaire; Polisseuse dentaire; Choix interdentaire; Outil d'élimination de la plaque dentaire; Gomme; Capsules blanchissants; Autre
bg-BG: Включени дентални елементи: Зъболекарско огледало; Зъболекарска полираща машина; Интердентален пикел; Инструмент за отстраняване на плаки; Гумичка за петна; Избелваща паста; Други
ja: 歯科アイテム (詳細): 歯科用ミラー; 歯科用研磨機; 歯間ピック; 歯垢除去ツール; 汚れ落とし; ホワイトニングペースト; その他
zh-TW: 牙科含有品項: 牙科用鏡; 牙齒拋光機; 齒間刷; 牙菌斑清除工具; 除污橡皮擦; 美白膏; 其他
it: Articoli di odontoiatria inclusi: Specchio dentale; Lucidatore dentale; Pick interdentale; Strumento per la rimozione della placca; Cancella macchie; Pasta sbiancante; Altro
ru: Состав набора стоматологических инструментов: Стоматологическое зеркало; Полировщик стоматологический; Межзубной ершик; Инструмент для удаления зубного налета; Стиратель пятен; Отбеливающая паста; Другое
nb: Tannpleieartikler medfølger: Tannspeil; Tannpolering; Tannrensstikke; Plakkfjerningsverktøy; Flekkfjerner; Blekende tannkrem; Annet
sl-SI: Priloženi zobozdravstveni izdelki: Zobno ogledalo; Polirnik za zobe; Dentalni zobotrebec; Orodje za odstranjevanje zobnih oblog; Radirka za madeže; Belilna pasta; Drugo
pt-BR: Itens de odontologia incluídos: Espelho dentário; Polidor dentário; Palito interdental; Ferramenta de remoção de placa; Borracha; Pasta clareadora; Outro
fi: Mukana hammastuotteita: Hammaspeili; Hammaskiillote; Hammasväliharja; Plakin poistotyökalu; Tahranpoistaja; Valkaisutahna; Muu
da: Tandlægeartikler inkluderet: Tandlægespejl; Tandpudser; Tandstik; Værktøj til plakfjernelse; Pletviskelæder; Tandblegningspuré; Andet
sv: Tandvårdsartiklar ingår: Munspegel; Tandpolerare; Interdentalval; Plackborttagningsverktyg; Fläckborttagare; Blekningspasta; Övrigt
es: Artículos de odontología incluidos: Espejo dental; Pulidor dental; Palillo interdental; Herramienta para eliminar placa; Borrador de manchas; Pasta blanqueadora; Otros
en: Dentistry items included: Dental mirror; Dental polisher; Interdental pick; Plaque removal tool; Stain eraser; Whitening paste; Other
vi: Các mặt hàng nha khoa đi kèm: Gương nha khoa; Dụng cụ đánh bóng nha khoa; Tăm nha khoa; Dụng cụ lấy cao răng; Thuốc tẩy vết bẩn; Kem làm trắng; Khác
hr-HR: Uključeni artikli stomatološkog pribora: Dentalno ogledalo; Alat za poliranje zubi; Interdentalna četkica; Alat za uklanjanje plaka; Otklanjivač mrlja; Pasta za izbjeljivanje; Ostalo